Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.510 and 2014 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:TABLE 1Sentencing GridSERIOUSNESSLEVELOFFENDER SCOREÂ 0123456789 ormoreXVI((Life sentence without parole/death penalty for offenders at or over the age of eighteen. For offenders under the age of eighteen, a term of twenty-five years to life))Sentence established by RCW 10.95.030.XV23y4m24y4m25y4m26y4m27y4m28y4m30y4m32y10m36y40yÂ 240-250-261-271-281-291-312-338-370-411-Â 320 333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493548XIV14y4m15y4m16y2m17y17y11m18y9m20y5m22y2m25y7m29yÂ 123-134-144-154-165-175-195-216-257-298-Â 220234244254265275295316357397XIII12y13y14y15y16y17y19y21y25y29yÂ 123-134-144-154-165-175-195-216-257-298-Â 164178192205219233260288342397XII9y9y11m10y9m11y8m12y6m13y5m15y9m17y3m20y3m23y3mÂ 93-102-111-120-129-138-162-178-209-240-Â 123136 147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318XI7y6m8y4m9y2m9y11m10y9m11y7m14y2m15y5m17y11m20y5mÂ 78-86-95-102-111-120-146-159-185-210-Â 102 114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280X5y5y6m6y6y6m7y7y6m9y6m10y6m12y6m14y6mÂ 51-57-62-67-72-77-98-108-129-149-Â 6875828996102130144171198IX3y3y6m4y4y6m5y5y6m7y6m8y6m10y6m12y6mÂ 31-36-41-46-51-57-77-87-108-129-Â 414854616875102116144171VIII2y2y6m3y3y6m4y4y6m6y6m7y6m8y6m10y6mÂ 21-26-31-36-41-46-67-77-87-108-Â 27344148546189102116144VII18m2y2y6m3y3y6m4y5y6m6y6m7y6m8y6mÂ 15-21-26-31-36-41-57-67-77-87-Â 2027344148547589102116VI13m18m2y2y6m3y3y6m4y6m5y6m6y6m7y6mÂ 12+-15-21-26-31-36-46-57-67-77-Â 14 2027344148617589102V9m13m15m18m2y2m3y2m4y5y6y7yÂ 6-12+-13-15-22-33-41-51-62-72-Â 12141720294354688296IV6m9m13m15m18m2y2m3y2m4y2m5y2m6y2mÂ 3-6-12+-13-15-22-33-43-53-63-Â 9121417202943577084III2m5m8m11m14m20m2y2m3y2m4y2m5yÂ 1-3-4-9-12+-17-22-33-43-51-Â 3 8 1212162229435768IIÂ 4m6m8m13m16m20m2y2m3y2m4y2mÂ 0-902-3-4-12+-14-17-22-33-43-Â Days6 9 12141822294357IÂ Â 3m4m5m8m13m16m20m2y2mÂ 0-600-902-2-3-4-12+-14-17-22-Â DaysDays5 6 8 1214 182229Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and third rows represent standard sentence ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.540 and 2014 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except to the extent provided in subsection (3) of this section, the following minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and shall not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535:(a) An offender convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than ((twenty))20 years.(b) An offender convicted of the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five years.(c) An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five years.(d) An offender convicted of the crime of sexually violent predator escape shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not less than ((sixty))60 months.(e) An offender convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder for a murder that was committed prior to the offender's ((eighteenth))21st birthday shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement ((not less than twenty-five years))that is consistent with RCW 10.95.030.(2) During such minimum terms of total confinement, no offender subject to the provisions of this section is eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply: (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree; ((or)) (c) for an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(((3)))(1)(c); or (d) for release approved by the board under RCW 9.94A.730.(3)(a) Subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section shall not be applied in sentencing of juveniles tried as adults pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(e)(i).(b) This subsection (3) applies only to crimes committed on or after July 24, 2005.Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.570 and 2000 c 28 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Notwithstanding the statutory maximum sentence or any other provision of this chapter, a persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for life without the possibility of release ((or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death. In addition, no offender subject to this section may be)).(2) A persistent offender is not eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of release as defined under RCW 9.94A.728(1)((, (2), (3), (4), (6), (8), or (9),))(b), (c), (e), (h), and (i) or any other form of authorized leave from a correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers, except: (((1)))(a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; or (((2)))(b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.(3) A persistent offender may be released from confinement by the board under RCW 9.94A.730 or 10.95.030(2).Sec. 4. RCW 9.94A.728 and 2023 c 358 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No incarcerated individual serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:(a) An incarcerated individual may earn early release time as authorized by RCW 9.94A.729;(b) An incarcerated individual may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, incarcerated individuals may leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections officer or officers;(c)(i) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical placement for an incarcerated individual when all of the following conditions exist:(A) The incarcerated individual has been assessed by two physicians and is determined to be one of the following:(I) Affected by a permanent or degenerative medical condition to such a degree that the individual does not presently, and likely will not in the future, pose a threat to public safety; or(II) In ill health and is expected to die within six months and does not presently, and likely will not in the future, pose a threat to public safety;(B) The incarcerated individual has been assessed as low risk to the community at the time of release; and(C) It is expected that granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in a cost savings to the state.(ii) An incarcerated individual sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical placement.(iii) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all individuals in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic monitoring equipment is detrimental to the individual's health, interferes with the function of the individual's medical equipment, or results in the loss of funding for the individual's medical care, in which case, an alternative type of monitoring shall be utilized. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed.(iv) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement under this subsection (1)(c) at any time.(v) Persistent offenders are not eligible for extraordinary medical placement;(d) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;(e) No more than the final 12 months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement for aiding the incarcerated individual with: Finding work as part of the work release program under chapter 72.65 RCW; or reestablishing himself or herself in the community as part of the parenting program in RCW 9.94A.6551. This is in addition to that period of earned early release time that may be exchanged for partial confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d);(f)(i) No more than the final five months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement may be served in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department under RCW 9.94A.733(1)(a);(ii) For eligible incarcerated individuals under RCW 9.94A.733(1)(b), after serving at least four months in total confinement in a state correctional facility, an incarcerated individual may serve no more than the final 18 months of the incarcerated individual's term of confinement in partial confinement as home detention as part of the graduated reentry program developed by the department;(g) The governor may pardon any incarcerated individual;(h) The department may release an incarcerated individual from confinement any time within 10 days before a release date calculated under this section;(i) An incarcerated individual may leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.870;(j) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an incarcerated individual sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.540; and(k) Any individual convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the individual's ((18th))21st birthday may be released from confinement pursuant to RCW 9.94A.730 and 10.95.030(2).(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an incarcerated individual entitled to vacation of a conviction or the recalculation of his or her offender score pursuant to State v. Blake, No. 96873-0 (Feb. 25, 2021), may be released from confinement pursuant to a court order if the incarcerated individual has already served a period of confinement that exceeds his or her new standard range. This provision does not create an independent right to release from confinement prior to resentencing.(3) Individuals residing in a juvenile correctional facility placement pursuant to RCW 72.01.410(1)(a) are not subject to the limitations in this section.Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.729 and 2022 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender actually earning the credits.(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the number of days of early release credits lost or not earned. The department may approve a jail certification from a correctional agency that calculates early release time based on the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence. The department must adjust an offender's rate of early release listed on the jail certification to be consistent with the rate applicable to offenders in the department's facilities. However, the department is not authorized to adjust the number of presentence early release days that the jail has certified as lost or not earned.(2)(a) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.(b) An offender whose sentence includes any impaired driving enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533(7), minor child enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533(13), or both, shall not receive any good time credits or earned release time for any portion of his or her sentence that results from those enhancements.(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:(a) In the case of an offender sentenced pursuant to RCW 10.95.030(((3) or 10.95.035))(2), the offender may not receive any earned early release time during the minimum term of confinement imposed by the court; for any remaining portion of the sentence served by the offender, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed 10 percent of the sentence.(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed 15 percent of the sentence.(c) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed 10 percent of the sentence.(d) An offender is qualified to earn up to 50 percent of aggregate earned release time if he or she:(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:(A) A sex offense;(B) A violent offense;(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine; or(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (d)(ii) of this subsection;(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to the extent that such programming or activities are made available by the department; and(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under community custody.(e) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed one-third of the total sentence.(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(d) of this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(d) of this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release time;(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the community;(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu of earned release time if the department determines an offender's release plan, including proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release plan, the department may do one or more of the following:(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(1)(e);(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to exceed six months if rental assistance will result in an approved release plan.A voucher must be provided in conjunction with additional transition support programming or services that enable an offender to participate in services including, but not limited to, substance abuse treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender treatment, educational programming, or employment programming;(e) The department shall maintain a list of housing providers that meets the requirements of RCW 72.09.285. If more than two voucher recipients will be residing per dwelling unit, as defined in RCW 59.18.030, rental vouchers for those recipients may only be paid to a housing provider on the department's list;(f) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the department shall gather data as recommended by the Washington state institute for public policy in order to best demonstrate whether rental vouchers are effective in reducing recidivism.(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW 9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this section.Sec. 6. RCW 9.94A.730 and 2024 c 118 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any person convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the person's ((18th))21st birthday may petition the indeterminate sentence review board for early release after serving no less than ((20))15 years of total confinement, provided the person has not been convicted for any crime committed subsequent to the person's ((18th))21st birthday, the person has not committed a disqualifying serious infraction as defined by the department in the 12 months prior to filing the petition for early release, and the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 10.95.030 ((or)), 9.94A.507, or 9.94A.540(1)(a).(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree committed prior to the person's 21st birthday may petition the indeterminate sentence review board for early release after serving no less than 20 years of total confinement, provided the person has not been convicted for any crime committed subsequent to the person's 21st birthday, the person has not committed a disqualifying serious infraction as defined by the department of corrections in the 12 months prior to filing the petition for early release, and the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 9.94A.507.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder committed prior to the person's 21st birthday may petition the indeterminate sentence review board for early release after serving no less than 25 years of total confinement, provided the person has not been convicted for any crime committed subsequent to the person's 21st birthday, the person has not committed a disqualifying serious infraction as defined by the department of corrections in the 12 months prior to filing the petition for early release, and the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 9.94A.507.(2) No later than five years prior to the date the offender will be eligible to petition for release, the department shall conduct an assessment of the offender and identify programming and services that would be appropriate to prepare the offender for return to the community. To the extent possible, the department shall make programming available as identified by the assessment.(3) No later than 180 days from receipt of the petition for early release, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, an examination of the person, incorporating methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability that the person will engage in future criminal behavior if released on conditions to be set by the board. The board may consider a person's failure to participate in an evaluation under this subsection in determining whether to release the person. The board shall order the person released under such affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than not that the person will commit new criminal law violations if released. The board shall give public safety considerations the highest priority when making all discretionary decisions regarding the ability for release and conditions of release.(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section, the board shall provide opportunities for victims and survivors of victims of any crimes for which the offender has been convicted to present statements as set forth in RCW 7.69.032. The procedures for victim and survivor of victim input shall be provided by rule. To facilitate victim and survivor of victim involvement, county prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and known contact information for victims of record and survivors of victims are forwarded as part of the judgment and sentence.(5) Any person released by the board pursuant to this section shall comply with conditions imposed or modified pursuant to RCW 9.94A.704(10), in addition to court-imposed conditions.(6) An offender released by the board is subject to the supervision of the department for a period of time to be determined by the board, up to the length of the court-imposed term of incarceration. The department shall monitor the offender's compliance with conditions of community custody imposed by the court or board and promptly report any violations to the board. Any violation of conditions of community custody established or modified by the board are subject to the provisions of RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.(7) An offender whose petition for release is denied may file a new petition for release five years from the date of denial or at an earlier date as may be set by the board.(8) An offender released under the provisions of this section may be returned to the institution at the discretion of the board if the offender is found to have violated a condition of community custody. The offender is entitled to a hearing pursuant to RCW 9.95.435. If the board finds that the offender has committed a new violation, the board may return the offender to the institution for up to the remainder of the court-imposed term of incarceration. The offender may file a new petition for release five years from the date of return to the institution or at an earlier date as may be set by the board.Sec. 7. RCW 10.95.030 and 2024 c 118 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any sort of good time calculation. The department of social and health services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.(2)(a)(i) Any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder for an offense committed prior to the person's 16th birthday shall be sentenced to a maximum term of life imprisonment and a minimum term of total confinement of 25 years.(ii) Any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder for an offense committed when the person is at least 16 years old but less than 18 years old shall be sentenced to a maximum term of life imprisonment and a minimum term of total confinement of no less than 25 years.(iii) Any person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder for an offense committed when the person is at least 18 years old but less than 21 years old shall be sentenced to a maximum term of life imprisonment and a minimum term of total confinement of no less than 25 years if the court determines that the mitigating factors that account for the diminished culpability of youth, as described in (b) of this subsection, apply to the current offense.(b) In setting a minimum term, the court must take into account mitigating factors that account for the diminished culpability of youth as provided in Miller v. Alabama, 132 S.Ct. 2455 (2012) including, but not limited to, the age of the individual, the youth's childhood and life experience, the degree of responsibility the youth was capable of exercising, and the youth's chances of becoming rehabilitated.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person convicted of one or more crimes committed prior to the person's 21st birthday may petition the indeterminate sentence review board for early release after serving no less than 25 years of total confinement, provided the person has not been convicted for any crime committed subsequent to the person's 21st birthday, the person has not committed a disqualifying serious infraction as defined by the department of corrections in the 12 months prior to filing the petition for early release, and the current sentence was not imposed under RCW 9.94A.507.(d) A person sentenced under this subsection shall serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state. During the minimum term of total confinement, the person shall not be eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized leave or absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply: (i) In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; or (ii) for an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).(((d)))(e) Any person sentenced pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to community custody under the supervision of the department of corrections and the authority of the indeterminate sentence review board. As part of any sentence under this subsection, the court shall require the person to comply with any conditions imposed by the board.(((e)))(f) Any person sentenced pursuant to this subsection shall comply with conditions imposed or modified pursuant to RCW 9.94A.704(10), in addition to court-imposed conditions.(((f) No later than five years prior to the expiration of the person's minimum term, the department of corrections shall conduct an assessment of the offender and identify programming and services that would be appropriate to prepare the offender for return to the community. To the extent possible, the department shall make programming available as identified by the assessment.(g) No later than 180 days prior to the expiration of the person's minimum term, the department of corrections shall conduct, and the offender shall participate in, an examination of the person, incorporating methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability that the person will engage in future criminal behavior if released on conditions to be set by the board. The board may consider a person's failure to participate in an evaluation under this subsection in determining whether to release the person. The board shall order the person released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than not that the person will commit new criminal law violations if released. If the board does not order the person released, the board shall set a new minimum term not to exceed five additional years. The board shall give public safety considerations the highest priority when making all discretionary decisions regarding the ability for release and conditions of release.(h) In a hearing conducted under (g) of this subsection, the board shall provide opportunities for victims and survivors of victims of any crimes for which the offender has been convicted to present statements as set forth in RCW 7.69.032. The procedures for victim and survivor of victim input shall be provided by rule. To facilitate victim and survivor of victim involvement, county prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and known contact information for victims of record and survivors of victims are forwarded as part of the judgment and sentence.(i) An offender released by the board is subject to the supervision of the department of corrections for a period of time to be determined by the board. The department shall monitor the offender's compliance with conditions of community custody imposed by the court or board and promptly report any violations to the board. Any violation of conditions of community custody established or modified by the board are subject to the provisions of RCW 9.95.425 through 9.95.440.(j) An offender released or discharged under this section may be returned to the institution at the discretion of the board if the offender is found to have violated a condition of community custody. The offender is entitled to a hearing pursuant to RCW 9.95.435. The board shall set a new minimum term of incarceration not to exceed five years))(g) Petitions for early release shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730 (2) through (8).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. RCW 10.95.035 (Return of persons to sentencing court if sentenced prior to June 1, 2014, under this chapter or any prior law, for a term of life without the possibility of parole for an offense committed prior to 18th birthday) and 2023 c 102 s 22, 2015 c 134 s 7, & 2014 c 130 s 11 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. Sections 2(2), 3, 4, 6, and 7(2)(c) of this act apply retroactively to persons incarcerated on the effective date of this section, regardless of the date of the offense or conviction.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. This act does not create any right or entitlement to release from incarceration before the end of a term of incarceration imposed by the court.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---